Illinois, session 104th, HB1233.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Sections 8, 8.1, 8.2, 8.3, and 10 as 6follows: 7    (430 ILCS 65/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8)8    Sec. 8. Grounds for denial and revocation. The Illinois 9State Police has authority to deny an application for or to 10revoke and seize a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 11previously issued under this Act and the circuit court of the 12county of the person's residence has the authority to revoke 13and order the seizure of the person's Firearm Owner's 14Identification Card under subsection (g) of Section 10 only if 15the Illinois State Police or circuit court finds that the 16applicant or the person to whom such card was issued is or was 17at the time of issuance:18        (a) A person under 21 years of age who has been 19    convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or 20    adjudged delinquent;21        (b) This subsection (b) applies through the 180th day 22    following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 23    101-80). A person under 21 years of age who does not have   HB1233- 2 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    the written consent of his parent or guardian to acquire 2    and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or whose 3    parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, or 4    where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 5    Firearm Owner's Identification Card;6        (b-5) This subsection (b-5) applies on and after the 7    181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of 8    Public Act 101-80). A person under 21 years of age who is 9    not an active duty member of the United States Armed 10    Forces or the Illinois National Guard and does not have 11    the written consent of his or her parent or guardian to 12    acquire and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or 13    whose parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, 14    or where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 15    Firearm Owner's Identification Card; 16        (c) A person convicted of a felony under the laws of 17    this or any other jurisdiction;18        (d) A person addicted to narcotics;19        (e) A person who has been a patient of a mental health 20    facility within the past 5 years or a person who has been a 21    patient in a mental health facility more than 5 years ago 22    who has not received the certification required under 23    subsection (u) of this Section. An active law enforcement 24    officer employed by a unit of government or a Department 25    of Corrections employee authorized to possess firearms who 26    is denied, revoked, or has his or her Firearm Owner's   HB1233- 3 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    Identification Card seized under this subsection (e) may 2    obtain relief as described in subsection (c-5) of Section 3    10 of this Act if the officer or employee did not act in a 4    manner threatening to the officer or employee, another 5    person, or the public as determined by the treating 6    clinical psychologist or physician, and the officer or 7    employee seeks mental health treatment;8        (f) A person whose mental condition is of such a 9    nature that it poses a clear and present danger to the 10    applicant, any other person or persons, or the community;11        (g) A person who has an intellectual disability;12        (h) A person who intentionally makes a false statement 13    in the Firearm Owner's Identification Card application or 14    endorsement affidavit;15        (i) A noncitizen who is unlawfully present in the 16    United States under the laws of the United States;17        (i-5) A noncitizen who has been admitted to the United 18    States under a non-immigrant visa (as that term is defined 19    in Section 101(a)(26) of the Immigration and Nationality 20    Act (8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(26))), except that this subsection 21    (i-5) does not apply to any noncitizen who has been 22    lawfully admitted to the United States under a 23    non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:24            (1) admitted to the United States for lawful 25        hunting or sporting purposes;26            (2) an official representative of a foreign   HB1233- 4 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1        government who is:2                (A) accredited to the United States Government 3            or the Government's mission to an international 4            organization having its headquarters in the United 5            States; or6                (B) en route to or from another country to 7            which that noncitizen is accredited;8            (3) an official of a foreign government or 9        distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 10        designated by the Department of State;11            (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 12        friendly foreign government entering the United States 13        on official business; or14            (5) one who has received a waiver from the 15        Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 18 16        U.S.C. 922(y)(3);17        (j) (Blank);18        (k) A person who has been convicted within the past 5 19    years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, violation 20    of an order of protection, or a substantially similar 21    offense in another jurisdiction, in which a firearm was 22    used or possessed;23        (l) A person who has been convicted of domestic 24    battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a substantially 25    similar offense in another jurisdiction committed before, 26    on or after January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public   HB1233- 5 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    Act 97-158). If the applicant or person who has been 2    previously issued a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 3    under this Act knowingly and intelligently waives the 4    right to have an offense described in this paragraph (l) 5    tried by a jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results 6    in a conviction for an offense in which a domestic 7    relationship is not a required element of the offense but 8    in which a determination of the applicability of 18 U.S.C. 9    922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of the Code of 10    Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the court of a 11    judgment of conviction for that offense shall be grounds 12    for denying an application for and for revoking and 13    seizing a Firearm Owner's Identification Card previously 14    issued to the person under this Act;15        (m) (Blank);16        (n) A person who is prohibited from acquiring or 17    possessing firearms or firearm ammunition by any Illinois 18    State statute or by federal law;19        (o) A minor subject to a petition filed under Section 20    5-520 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 alleging that the 21    minor is a delinquent minor for the commission of an 22    offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony; 23        (p) An adult who had been adjudicated a delinquent 24    minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for the 25    commission of an offense that if committed by an adult 26    would be a felony;  HB1233- 6 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1        (q) A person who is not a resident of the State of 2    Illinois, except as provided in subsection (a-10) of 3    Section 4; 4        (r) A person who has been adjudicated as a person with 5    a mental disability; 6        (s) A person who has been found to have a 7    developmental disability; 8        (t) A person involuntarily admitted into a mental 9    health facility; or 10        (u) A person who has had his or her Firearm Owner's 11    Identification Card revoked or denied under subsection (e) 12    of this Section or item (iv) of paragraph (2) of 13    subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act because he or she 14    was a patient in a mental health facility as provided in 15    subsection (e) of this Section, shall not be permitted to 16    obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, after the 17    5-year period has lapsed, unless he or she has received a 18    mental health evaluation by a physician, clinical 19    psychologist, or qualified examiner as those terms are 20    defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 21    Disabilities Code, and has received a certification that 22    he or she is not a clear and present danger to himself, 23    herself, or others. The physician, clinical psychologist, 24    or qualified examiner making the certification and his or 25    her employer shall not be held criminally, civilly, or 26    professionally liable for making or not making the   HB1233- 7 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    certification required under this subsection, except for 2    willful or wanton misconduct. This subsection does not 3    apply to a person whose firearm possession rights have 4    been restored through administrative or judicial action 5    under Section 10 or 11 of this Act. 6    Upon revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 7Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall provide 8notice to the person and the person shall comply with Section 99.5 of this Act. 10(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 11102-645, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 125-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 13    (430 ILCS 65/8.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8.1)14    Sec. 8.1. Notifications to the Illinois State Police and 15State's Attorney. 16    (a) The Circuit Clerk shall, in the form and manner 17required by the Supreme Court, notify the Illinois State 18Police and the State's Attorney of the county of residence of 19the person for which the disposition is applicable of all 20final dispositions of cases for which the Illinois State 21Police Department has received information reported to it 22under Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of the Criminal Identification Act.23    (b) Upon adjudication of any individual as a person with a 24mental disability as defined in Section 1.1 of this Act or a 25finding that a person has been involuntarily admitted, the   HB1233- 8 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1court shall direct the circuit court clerk to immediately 2notify the Illinois State Police, Firearm Owner's 3Identification (FOID) department and the State's Attorney of 4the county of residence of the person adjudicated with the 5mental disability or involuntarily admitted, and shall forward 6a copy of the court order to the Illinois State Police 7Department. 8    (b-1) Beginning July 1, 2016, and each July 1 and December 930 of every year thereafter, the circuit court clerk shall, in 10the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, 11notify the Illinois State Police, Firearm Owner's 12Identification (FOID) department if the court has not directed 13the circuit court clerk to notify the Illinois State Police, 14Firearm Owner's Identification (FOID) department under 15subsection (b) of this Section, within the preceding 6 months, 16because no person has been adjudicated as a person with a 17mental disability by the court as defined in Section 1.1 of 18this Act or if no person has been involuntarily admitted. The 19Supreme Court may adopt any orders or rules necessary to 20identify the persons who shall be reported to the Illinois 21State Police under subsection (b), or any other orders or 22rules necessary to implement the requirements of this Act. 23    (c) The Department of Human Services shall, in the form 24and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, report all 25information collected under subsection (b) of Section 12 of 26the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities   HB1233- 9 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1Confidentiality Act for the purpose of determining whether a 2person who may be or may have been a patient in a mental health 3facility is disqualified under State or federal law from 4receiving or retaining a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, 5or purchasing a weapon.6    (d) If a person is determined to pose a clear and present 7danger to himself, herself, or to others:8        (1) by a physician, clinical psychologist, or 9    qualified examiner, or is determined to have a 10    developmental disability by a physician, clinical 11    psychologist, or qualified examiner, whether employed by 12    the State or privately, then the physician, clinical 13    psychologist, or qualified examiner shall, within 24 hours 14    of making the determination, notify the Department of 15    Human Services that the person poses a clear and present 16    danger or has a developmental disability; or17        (2) by a law enforcement official or school 18    administrator, then the law enforcement official or school 19    administrator shall, within 24 hours of making the 20    determination, notify the Illinois State Police and the 21    State's Attorney of the county of residence that the 22    person poses a clear and present danger. 23    The Department of Human Services shall immediately update 24its records and information relating to mental health and 25developmental disabilities, and if appropriate, shall notify 26the Illinois State Police in a form and manner prescribed by   HB1233- 10 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1the Illinois State Police and the State's Attorney of the 2county of residence of the person. The State's Attorney of the 3county of residence of the person Illinois State Police shall 4determine whether to seek a hearing before the circuit court 5of residence of the person to revoke the person's Firearm 6Owner's Identification Card under Section 8 of this Act. Any 7information disclosed under this subsection shall remain 8privileged and confidential, and shall not be redisclosed, 9except as required under subsection (e) of Section 3.1 of this 10Act, nor used for any other purpose. The method of providing 11this information shall guarantee that the information is not 12released beyond what is necessary for the purpose of this 13Section and shall be provided by rule by the Department of 14Human Services. The identity of the person reporting under 15this Section shall not be disclosed to the subject of the 16report. The physician, clinical psychologist, qualified 17examiner, law enforcement official, or school administrator 18making the determination and his or her employer shall not be 19held criminally, civilly, or professionally liable for making 20or not making the notification required under this subsection, 21except for willful or wanton misconduct.22    (e) The Supreme Court Illinois State Police shall adopt 23rules to implement this Section. 24(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 25    (430 ILCS 65/8.2)  HB1233- 11 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    Sec. 8.2. Firearm Owner's Identification Card denial, 2suspension, or revocation. The Illinois State Police shall 3deny an application or shall suspend or revoke and seize a 4Firearm Owner's Identification Card previously issued under 5this Act if the Department finds that the applicant or person 6to whom such card was issued is or was at the time of issuance 7subject to a protective order issued under the laws of this or 8any other jurisdiction. When the duration of the protective 9order is expected to be less than 45 days one year, the 10Illinois State Police may suspend the Firearm Owner's 11Identification Card under Section 8.3 of the Act and shall 12reinstate it upon conclusion of the suspension if no other 13grounds for denial or revocation are found under Section 8 of 14the Act. 15(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 16    (430 ILCS 65/8.3)17    Sec. 8.3. Suspension of Firearm Owner's Identification 18Card. The Illinois State Police may suspend the Firearm 19Owner's Identification Card of a person whose Firearm Owner's 20Identification Card is subject to revocation and seizure under 21this Act for a period of not less than 30 days and not more 22than 45 days. The Illinois State Police shall schedule a 23revocation hearing with the clerk of the circuit court and the 24State's Attorney of the county of the person's residence not 25less than 30 days and not more than 45 days after the   HB1233- 12 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1suspension of the person's Firearm Owner's Identification 2Card. If the hearing is not scheduled within that 45-day 3period, the Illinois State Police shall reinstate the person's 4Firearm Owner's Identification Card and may not seek 5revocation of that person's Firearm Owner's Identification 6Card. The hearing shall be conducted in the manner provided in 7subsection (g) of Section 10 the duration of the 8disqualification if the disqualification is not a permanent 9ground for revocation of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 10under this Act. The Illinois State Police may adopt rules 11necessary to implement this Section. 12(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 14    (430 ILCS 65/10)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-10)15    Sec. 10. Appeals; hearing; relief from firearm 16prohibitions. 17    (a) Whenever an application for a Firearm Owner's 18Identification Card is denied or whenever such a Card is 19revoked or seized as provided for in Section 8 of this Act, the 20aggrieved party may (1) file a record challenge with the 21Director regarding the record upon which the decision to deny 22or revoke the Firearm Owner's Identification Card was based 23under subsection (a-5); or (2) appeal to the Director of the 24Illinois State Police through December 31, 2022, or beginning 25January 1, 2023, the Firearm Owner's Identification Card   HB1233- 13 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1Review Board for a hearing seeking relief from such denial or 2revocation unless the denial or revocation was based upon a 3forcible felony, stalking, aggravated stalking, domestic 4battery, any violation of the Illinois Controlled Substances 5Act, the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 6or the Cannabis Control Act that is classified as a Class 2 or 7greater felony, any felony violation of Article 24 of the 8Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or any 9adjudication as a delinquent minor for the commission of an 10offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony, in 11which case the aggrieved party may petition the circuit court 12in writing in the county of his or her residence for a hearing 13seeking relief from such denial or revocation.14    (a-5) There is created a Firearm Owner's Identification 15Card Review Board to consider any appeal under subsection (a) 16beginning January 1, 2023, other than an appeal directed to 17the circuit court and except when the applicant is challenging 18the record upon which the decision to deny or revoke was based 19as provided in subsection (a-10).20        (0.05) In furtherance of the policy of this Act that 21    the Board shall exercise its powers and duties in an 22    independent manner, subject to the provisions of this Act 23    but free from the direction, control, or influence of any 24    other agency or department of State government. All 25    expenses and liabilities incurred by the Board in the 26    performance of its responsibilities hereunder shall be   HB1233- 14 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    paid from funds which shall be appropriated to the Board 2    by the General Assembly for the ordinary and contingent 3    expenses of the Board. 4        (1) The Board shall consist of 7 members appointed by 5    the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, 6    with 3 members residing within the First Judicial District 7    and one member residing within each of the 4 remaining 8    Judicial Districts. No more than 4 members shall be 9    members of the same political party. The Governor shall 10    designate one member as the chairperson. The members shall 11    have actual experience in law, education, social work, 12    behavioral sciences, law enforcement, or community affairs 13    or in a combination of those areas. 14        (2) The terms of the members initially appointed after 15    January 1, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 102-237) 16    shall be as follows: one of the initial members shall be 17    appointed for a term of one year, 3 shall be appointed for 18    terms of 2 years, and 3 shall be appointed for terms of 4 19    years. Thereafter, members shall hold office for 4 years, 20    with terms expiring on the second Monday in January 21    immediately following the expiration of their terms and 22    every 4 years thereafter. Members may be reappointed. 23    Vacancies in the office of member shall be filled in the 24    same manner as the original appointment, for the remainder 25    of the unexpired term. The Governor may remove a member 26    for incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance, or   HB1233- 15 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    inability to serve. Members shall receive compensation in 2    an amount equal to the compensation of members of the 3    Executive Ethics Commission and, beginning July 1, 2023, 4    shall be compensated from appropriations provided to the 5    Comptroller for this purpose. Members may be reimbursed, 6    from funds appropriated for such a purpose, for reasonable 7    expenses actually incurred in the performance of their 8    Board duties. The Illinois State Police shall designate an 9    employee to serve as Executive Director of the Board and 10    provide logistical and administrative assistance to the 11    Board. 12        (3) The Board shall meet at least quarterly each year 13    and at the call of the chairperson as often as necessary to 14    consider appeals of decisions made with respect to 15    applications for a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 16    under this Act. If necessary to ensure the participation 17    of a member, the Board shall allow a member to participate 18    in a Board meeting by electronic communication. Any member 19    participating electronically shall be deemed present for 20    purposes of establishing a quorum and voting.21        (4) The Board shall adopt rules for the review of 22    appeals and the conduct of hearings. The Board shall 23    maintain a record of its decisions and all materials 24    considered in making its decisions. All Board decisions 25    and voting records shall be kept confidential and all 26    materials considered by the Board shall be exempt from   HB1233- 16 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    inspection except upon order of a court.2        (5) In considering an appeal, the Board shall review 3    the materials received concerning the denial or revocation 4    by the Illinois State Police. By a vote of at least 4 5    members, the Board may request additional information from 6    the Illinois State Police or the applicant or the 7    testimony of the Illinois State Police or the applicant. 8    The Board may require that the applicant submit electronic 9    fingerprints to the Illinois State Police for an updated 10    background check if the Board determines it lacks 11    sufficient information to determine eligibility. The Board 12    may consider information submitted by the Illinois State 13    Police, a law enforcement agency, or the applicant. The 14    Board shall review each denial or revocation and determine 15    by a majority of members whether an applicant should be 16    granted relief under subsection (c).17        (6) The Board shall by order issue summary decisions. 18    The Board shall issue a decision within 45 days of 19    receiving all completed appeal documents from the Illinois 20    State Police and the applicant. However, the Board need 21    not issue a decision within 45 days if:22            (A) the Board requests information from the 23        applicant, including, but not limited to, electronic 24        fingerprints to be submitted to the Illinois State 25        Police, in accordance with paragraph (5) of this 26        subsection, in which case the Board shall make a   HB1233- 17 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1        decision within 30 days of receipt of the required 2        information from the applicant;3            (B) the applicant agrees, in writing, to allow the 4        Board additional time to consider an appeal; or5            (C) the Board notifies the applicant and the 6        Illinois State Police that the Board needs an 7        additional 30 days to issue a decision. The Board may 8        only issue 2 extensions under this subparagraph (C). 9        The Board's notification to the applicant and the 10        Illinois State Police shall include an explanation for 11        the extension.12        (7) If the Board determines that the applicant is 13    eligible for relief under subsection (c), the Board shall 14    notify the applicant and the Illinois State Police that 15    relief has been granted and the Illinois State Police 16    shall issue the Card.17        (8) Meetings of the Board shall not be subject to the 18    Open Meetings Act and records of the Board shall not be 19    subject to the Freedom of Information Act.20        (9) The Board shall report monthly to the Governor and 21    the General Assembly on the number of appeals received and 22    provide details of the circumstances in which the Board 23    has determined to deny Firearm Owner's Identification 24    Cards under this subsection (a-5). The report shall not 25    contain any identifying information about the applicants. 26    (a-10) Whenever an applicant or cardholder is not seeking   HB1233- 18 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1relief from a firearms prohibition under subsection (c) but 2rather does not believe the applicant is appropriately denied 3or revoked and is challenging the record upon which the 4decision to deny or revoke the Firearm Owner's Identification 5Card was based, or whenever the Illinois State Police fails to 6act on an application within 30 days of its receipt, the 7applicant shall file such challenge with the Director. The 8Director shall render a decision within 60 business days of 9receipt of all information supporting the challenge. The 10Illinois State Police shall adopt rules for the review of a 11record challenge. 12    (b) At least 30 days before any hearing in the circuit 13court, the petitioner shall serve the relevant State's 14Attorney with a copy of the petition. The State's Attorney may 15object to the petition and present evidence. At the hearing, 16the court shall determine whether substantial justice has been 17done. Should the court determine that substantial justice has 18not been done, the court shall issue an order directing the 19Illinois State Police to issue a Card. However, the court 20shall not issue the order if the petitioner is otherwise 21prohibited from obtaining, possessing, or using a firearm 22under federal law. 23    (c) Any person prohibited from possessing a firearm under 24Sections 24-1.1 or 24-3.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or 25acquiring a Firearm Owner's Identification Card under Section 268 of this Act may apply to the Firearm Owner's Identification   HB1233- 19 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1Card Review Board or petition the circuit court in the county 2where the petitioner resides, whichever is applicable in 3accordance with subsection (a) of this Section, requesting 4relief from such prohibition and the Board or court may grant 5such relief if it is established by the applicant to the 6court's or the Board's satisfaction that:7        (0.05) when in the circuit court, the State's Attorney 8    has been served with a written copy of the petition at 9    least 30 days before any such hearing in the circuit court 10    and at the hearing the State's Attorney was afforded an 11    opportunity to present evidence and object to the 12    petition;13        (1) the applicant has not been convicted of a forcible 14    felony under the laws of this State or any other 15    jurisdiction within 20 years of the applicant's 16    application for a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, or 17    at least 20 years have passed since the end of any period 18    of imprisonment imposed in relation to that conviction;19        (2) the circumstances regarding a criminal conviction, 20    where applicable, the applicant's criminal history and his 21    reputation are such that the applicant will not be likely 22    to act in a manner dangerous to public safety;23        (3) granting relief would not be contrary to the 24    public interest; and25        (4) granting relief would not be contrary to federal 26    law.  HB1233- 20 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1    (c-5) (1) An active law enforcement officer employed by a 2unit of government or a Department of Corrections employee 3authorized to possess firearms who is denied a , revoked, or 4has his or her Firearm Owner's Identification Card seized 5under subsection (e) of Section 8 of this Act may apply to the 6Firearm Owner's Identification Card Review Board requesting 7relief if the officer or employee did not act in a manner 8threatening to the officer or employee, another person, or the 9public as determined by the treating clinical psychologist or 10physician, and as a result of his or her work is referred by 11the employer for or voluntarily seeks mental health evaluation 12or treatment by a licensed clinical psychologist, 13psychiatrist, or qualified examiner, and:14        (A) the officer or employee has not received treatment 15    involuntarily at a mental health facility, regardless of 16    the length of admission; or has not been voluntarily 17    admitted to a mental health facility for more than 30 days 18    and not for more than one incident within the past 5 years; 19    and20        (B) the officer or employee has not left the mental 21    institution against medical advice.22    (2) The Firearm Owner's Identification Card Review Board 23shall grant expedited relief to active law enforcement 24officers and employees described in paragraph (1) of this 25subsection (c-5) upon a determination by the Board that the 26officer's or employee's possession of a firearm does not   HB1233- 21 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1present a threat to themselves, others, or public safety. The 2Board shall act on the request for relief within 30 business 3days of receipt of:4        (A) a notarized statement from the officer or employee 5    in the form prescribed by the Board detailing the 6    circumstances that led to the hospitalization;7        (B) all documentation regarding the admission, 8    evaluation, treatment and discharge from the treating 9    licensed clinical psychologist or psychiatrist of the 10    officer;11        (C) a psychological fitness for duty evaluation of the 12    person completed after the time of discharge; and13        (D) written confirmation in the form prescribed by the 14    Board from the treating licensed clinical psychologist or 15    psychiatrist that the provisions set forth in paragraph 16    (1) of this subsection (c-5) have been met, the person 17    successfully completed treatment, and their professional 18    opinion regarding the person's ability to possess 19    firearms.20    (3) Officers and employees eligible for the expedited 21relief in paragraph (2) of this subsection (c-5) have the 22burden of proof on eligibility and must provide all 23information required. The Board may not consider granting 24expedited relief until the proof and information is received.25    (4) "Clinical psychologist", "psychiatrist", and 26"qualified examiner" shall have the same meaning as provided   HB1233- 22 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1in Chapter I of the Mental Health and Developmental 2Disabilities Code. 3    (c-10) (1) An applicant, who is denied a , revoked, or has 4his or her Firearm Owner's Identification Card seized under 5subsection (e) of Section 8 of this Act based upon a 6determination of a developmental disability or an intellectual 7disability may apply to the Firearm Owner's Identification 8Card Review Board requesting relief.9    (2) The Board shall act on the request for relief within 60 10business days of receipt of written certification, in the form 11prescribed by the Board, from a physician or clinical 12psychologist, or qualified examiner, that the aggrieved 13party's developmental disability or intellectual disability 14condition is determined by a physician, clinical psychologist, 15or qualified to be mild. If a fact-finding conference is 16scheduled to obtain additional information concerning the 17circumstances of the denial or revocation, the 60 business 18days the Director has to act shall be tolled until the 19completion of the fact-finding conference.20    (3) The Board may grant relief if the aggrieved party's 21developmental disability or intellectual disability is mild as 22determined by a physician, clinical psychologist, or qualified 23examiner and it is established by the applicant to the Board's 24satisfaction that:25        (A) granting relief would not be contrary to the 26    public interest; and  HB1233- 23 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1        (B) granting relief would not be contrary to federal 2    law.3    (4) The Board may not grant relief if the condition is 4determined by a physician, clinical psychologist, or qualified 5examiner to be moderate, severe, or profound.6    (5) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 99-29 7apply to requests for relief pending on or before July 10, 2015 8(the effective date of Public Act 99-29), except that the 960-day period for the Director to act on requests pending 10before the effective date shall begin on July 10, 2015 (the 11effective date of Public Act 99-29). All appeals as provided 12in subsection (a-5) pending on January 1, 2023 shall be 13considered by the Board. 14    (d) When a minor is adjudicated delinquent for an offense 15which if committed by an adult would be a felony, the court 16shall notify the Illinois State Police.17    (e) The court shall review the denial of an application or 18the revocation of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a 19person who has been adjudicated delinquent for an offense that 20if committed by an adult would be a felony if an application 21for relief has been filed at least 10 years after the 22adjudication of delinquency and the court determines that the 23applicant should be granted relief from disability to obtain a 24Firearm Owner's Identification Card. If the court grants 25relief, the court shall notify the Illinois State Police that 26the disability has been removed and that the applicant is   HB1233- 24 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1eligible to obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card.2    (f) Any person who is subject to the disabilities of 18 3U.S.C. 922(d)(4) and 922(g)(4) of the federal Gun Control Act 4of 1968 because of an adjudication or commitment that occurred 5under the laws of this State or who was determined to be 6subject to the provisions of subsections (e), (f), or (g) of 7Section 8 of this Act may apply to the Illinois State Police 8requesting relief from that prohibition. The Board shall grant 9the relief if it is established by a preponderance of the 10evidence that the person will not be likely to act in a manner 11dangerous to public safety and that granting relief would not 12be contrary to the public interest. In making this 13determination, the Board shall receive evidence concerning (i) 14the circumstances regarding the firearms disabilities from 15which relief is sought; (ii) the petitioner's mental health 16and criminal history records, if any; (iii) the petitioner's 17reputation, developed at a minimum through character witness 18statements, testimony, or other character evidence; and (iv) 19changes in the petitioner's condition or circumstances since 20the disqualifying events relevant to the relief sought. If 21relief is granted under this subsection or by order of a court 22under this Section, the Director shall as soon as practicable 23but in no case later than 15 business days, update, correct, 24modify, or remove the person's record in any database that the 25Illinois State Police makes available to the National Instant 26Criminal Background Check System and notify the United States   HB1233- 25 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1Attorney General that the basis for the record being made 2available no longer applies. The Illinois State Police shall 3adopt rules for the administration of this Section.4    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act to the 5contrary, on or after the effective date of this amendatory 6Act of the 103rd General Assembly, the Illinois State Police 7may not revoke a Firearm Owner's Identification Card. On or 8after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd 9General Assembly, a Firearm Owner's Identification Card may 10only be revoked after a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 11hearing has been held in the circuit court of the county of 12residence of the person whose Firearm Owner's Identification 13Card is sought to be revoked. If the State's Attorney of the 14county of residence of the person whose Firearm Owner's 15Identification Card is sought to be revoked has probable cause 16to believe that the person who has been issued a Firearm 17Owner's Identification Card is no longer eligible for the Card 18under Section 8, the State's Attorney shall file a petition in 19the circuit court of the county of residence of the person 20whose Card is sought to be revoked. At the hearing, the person 21may present evidence in his or her favor seeking retention of 22his or her Firearm Owner's Identification Card and the 23Illinois State Police and State's Attorney may present 24evidence for revocation. The hearing shall be a civil 25proceeding and subject to due process, the Code of Civil 26Procedure, and the Illinois Rules of Evidence as adopted by   HB1233- 26 -LRB104 03624 BDA 13648 b1the Supreme Court. The hearing shall be held within 45 days 2after the filing of the petition. If the circuit court 3determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that the person 4is ineligible for retention of his or her Firearm Owner's 5Identification Card under Section 8, the court shall order the 6Illinois State Police to immediately revoke the Card and the 7circuit clerk shall seize the Card and transmit the Card to the 8Illinois State Police. 9(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-645, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1115, eff. 111-9-23; 102-1129, eff. 2-10-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)